Ohio, session 136, HB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.914 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.914. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 7
lanes of interstate route number seventy-one between east fifth 8
avenue and Cooke road, in the municipal corporation of Columbus 9
in Franklin county, shall be known as the "George Walker 10
Memorial Highway." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
along the highway indicating its name. 13